Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.105

Clerk may take acknowledgments.

The clerk or deputy clerk of any city having a commission form of government shall, without charge, take acknowledgments and administer oaths required by law on all claims and demands against the city.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.105.]